Tennessee, session 114, HB2002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-11-116, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) After July 1, 2026, if a trail is added to the trail system or if a trail undergoes
a renovation, then the department shall ensure that:
(1) A marker is placed at each access point to the trail that includes
emergency reporting information;
(2) Mile markers are posted alongside the trail or a numbered emergency
location sign is posted at the approximate mid-point of the trail if the trail is less
than one mile (1 mi.); and
(3) Vegetation is routinely cleared or cut back to maintain clear sightlines
to signage along the trail and at access points.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-12-206, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(c) After July 1, 2026, if the commissioner designates a new jogging trail or if a
jogging trail undergoes a renovation, then the agency having jurisdiction over the
property comprising the jogging trail shall ensure that:
(1) A marker is placed at each access point to the jogging trail that
includes emergency reporting information;
HB2002
011809
- 1 -

(2) Mile markers are posted alongside the jogging trail or a numbered
emergency location sign is posted at the approximate mid-point of the jogging
trail if the jogging trail is less than one mile (1 mi.); and
(3) Vegetation is routinely cleared or cut back to maintain clear sightlines
to signage along the jogging trail and at access points.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011809